District of Columbia statutes.
47-2828

Classification of buildings containing living quarters for licenses; fees; buildings exempt from license requirement.

(a)

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized and empowered to classify, according to use, method of operation, and size, buildings containing living or lodging quarters of every description, to require licenses for the business operated in each such building as in its judgment requires inspection, supervision or regulation by any municipal agency or agencies, and the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and empowered to fix a schedule of license fees therefor in such amount as, in his judgment, will be commensurate with the cost to the District of Columbia of such inspection, supervision or regulation: owners of residential buildings in which one or more dwelling units or rooming units are offered for rent or lease shall obtain from the Mayor a license to operate such business.

(b)

Licenses for hotels, inns and motels, boarding houses and rooming houses, bed and breakfasts, and other transient Housing businesses shall be issued under the basic business license system as a Housing: Transient endorsement on a basic business license.

(c)

Licenses for apartment houses, all community based residential facilities, and other residential Housing businesses shall be issued under the basic business license system as a Housing: Residential endorsement on a basic business license.

(d)

Licenses for businesses engaged in home improvement services issued under this section shall be issued as a General Services and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 626, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 28
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 555, ch. 366
July 22, 1947, 61 Stat. 402, ch. 296, § 3
July 25, 1995, D.C. Law 11-30, § 10, 42 DCR 1547
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254,§ 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(25), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(b), 50 DCR 6913
Human rights, “housing business” defined, see § 2-1401.02.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-32
This section is referenced in § 2-1401.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-2828.
1973 Ed., § 47-2328.
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “bed and breakfasts, and other transient Housing businesses shall be issued under the basic business license system as a Housing: Transient endorsement on a basic business license” for “and other transient Class A Housing businesses shall be issued under the master business license system as a Class A Housing: Transient endorsement on a master license”; in subsec. (c), substituted “all community based residential facilities, and other residential Housing businesses shall be issued under the basic business license system as a Housing: Residential endorsement on a basic business license” for “cooperative associations, and other residential Class A Housing businesses shall be issued under the master business license system as a Class A Housing: Residential endorsement on a master license”; and, in subsec. (d), substituted “General Services and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system” for “Class B General Services and Repair endorsement to a master business license under the master business license system”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).